Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-938
University of Nebraska; maintain graduate college and faculty status.

The University of Nebraska is encouraged to maintain its existing single university-wide graduate college and maintain for its graduate faculty all rights, privileges, and responsibilities associated with graduate faculty status.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 22.